apertium-lat.lat.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!   M O R P H O L O G I C A L · T R A N S D U C E R · F O R · L A T I N    !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


Multichar_Symbols

!!! general pos !!!

%<n%> 
%<v%>

!!! nominal cases !!!

%<nom%>            
%<gen%>            
%<dat%>            
%<acc%>            
%<voc%>            
%<abl%>       

!!! VERBAL MOODS !!!

%<ind%>
%<cong%>
%<imp%>
%<inf%>

!!! VERBAL TENSES !!!

%<pres%> 
%<impf%>
%<fut%>
%<perf%>
%<pperf%>
%<pfut%>

!!! VERBAL TAGS !!!

%<pass%>

!!! Number !!!

%<sg%> 
%<pl%> 

!!! GEnere !!!

%<m%>
%<f%>
%<n%>

!!! adjectives !!!

%<adj%>



LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Adjectives ;
Verbs ;

LEXICON CASE1

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:a  # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ae # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:a  # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:am # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:a  # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:a  # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ae # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:arum # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:is  # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:as  # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<voc%>:ae  # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:is  # ;



LEXICON CASE1-PL-TANT 

%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ae # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:arum # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:is  # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:as  # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<voc%>:ae  # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:is  # ;

LEXICON CASE1-SG-TANT

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:a  # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ae # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:a  # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:am # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:a  # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:a  # ;


!!!!!!! ADJECTIVES !!!!!!

!!!! FIRST CLASS -US -A -UM

LEXICON ADJ-CLASS1

%<adj%>: ADJ-CLASS-1-M ;
%<adj%>: ADJ-CLASS-1-F ;
%<adj%>: ADJ-CLASS-1-N ;

!!!! FIRST CLASS M. !!!!

LEXICON ADJ-CLASS-1-M 

%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:us # ;
%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:i # ;
%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:o # ;
%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:um # ;
%<m%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:e # ;
%<m%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:o # ;
%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:i # ;
%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:orum # ;
%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:is # ;
%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:os # ;
%<m%>%<pl%>%<voc%>:i # ;
%<m%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:is # ;


LEXICON ADJ-CLASS-1-F

%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ae # ;
%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ae # ;
%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:am # ;
%<f%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:a # ;
%<f%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:a # ;
%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ae # ;
%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:arum # ;
%<f%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:is # ;
%<f%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:as # ;
%<f%>%<pl%>%<voc%>:ae # ;
%<f%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:is # ;

LEXICON ADJ-CLASS-1-N

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:um # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:i # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:o # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:um # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:um # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:o # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:orum # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:is # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<voc%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:is # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! V E R B S !!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! FIRST CONJUGATION i.e. laudo/as/avi/atum/are!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CONJ1 

%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PRES1 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PRES1-PASS ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-IMPF1 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-IMPF1-PASS ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-FUTR1 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-FUTR1-PASS ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PRES1 ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PRES1-PASS ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF1 ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF1-PASS ;
%<v%>: IMPERATIVE-PRESENT1 ;


LEXICON INDICATIVE-PRES1 

%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:o # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:as # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:at # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:amus # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:atis # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ant # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-PRES1-PASS

%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:or # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:aris # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:atur # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:amur # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:amini # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:antur # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-IMPF1

%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:abam # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:abas # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:abat # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:abamus # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:abatis # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:abant # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-IMPF1-PASS

%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:abar # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:abaris # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:abatur # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:abamur # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:abamini # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:abantur # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-FUTR1

%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:abo # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:abis # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:abit # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:abimus # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:abitis # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:abunt # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-FUTR1-PASS

%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:abor # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:aberis # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:abitur # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:abimur # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:abimini # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:abuntur # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PRES1 

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:em # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:es # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:et # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:emus # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:etis # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ent # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PRES1-PASS

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:er # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eris # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:etur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:emur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:emini # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:entur # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF1 

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:arem # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ares # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:aret # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:aremus # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:aretis # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:arent # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF1-PASS

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:arer # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:areris # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:aretur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:aremur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:aremini # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:arentur # ;

LEXICON IMPERATIVE-PRESENT1

%<imp%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>: a # ;
%<imp%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>: ate # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! REGULAR PERFECT  -i.e. Laudavi, Monui, Lexi, Audivi,!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON REGULAR-PERFECT

%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PERF ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PPERF ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PFUT ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PERF ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PPERF ;
%<v%>: INFINITE-PERFECT ;



LEXICON INDICATIVE-PERF 

%<ind%>%<perf%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:i # ;
%<ind%>%<perf%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:isti # ;
%<ind%>%<perf%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:it # ;
%<ind%>%<perf%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:imus # ;
%<ind%>%<perf%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:istis # ;
%<ind%>%<perf%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:erunt # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-PPERF

%<ind%>%<pperf%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:eram # ;
%<ind%>%<pperf%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eras # ;
%<ind%>%<pperf%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:erat # ;
%<ind%>%<pperf%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:eramus # ;
%<ind%>%<pperf%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:eratis # ;
%<ind%>%<pperf%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:erant # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-PFUT

%<ind%>%<pfut%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ero # ;
%<ind%>%<pfut%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eris # ;
%<ind%>%<pfut%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:erit # ;
%<ind%>%<pfut%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:erimus # ;
%<ind%>%<pfut%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:eritis # ;
%<ind%>%<pfut%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:erint # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PERF 

%<cong%>%<perf%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:erim # ;
%<cong%>%<perf%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eris # ;
%<cong%>%<perf%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:erit # ;
%<cong%>%<perf%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:erimus # ;
%<cong%>%<perf%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:eritis # ;
%<cong%>%<perf%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:erint # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PPERF

%<cong%>%<pperf%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:issem # ;
%<cong%>%<pperf%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:isses # ;
%<cong%>%<pperf%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:isset # ;
%<cong%>%<pperf%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:issemus # ;
%<cong%>%<pperf%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:issetis # ;
%<cong%>%<pperf%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:issent # ;

LEXICON INFINITE-PERFECT

%<inf%>%<perf%>: isse # ;






!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! SECOND CONJUGATION i.e. moneo/es/ui/itum/ere !!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CONJ2

%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PRES2 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PRES2-PASS ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-IMPF2 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-IMPF2-PASS ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-FUTR2 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-FUTR2-PASS ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PRES2 ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PRES2-PASS ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF2 ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF2-PASS ;
%<v%>: IMPERATIVE-PRESENT2 ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-PRES2

%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:eo # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:es # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:et # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:emus # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:etis # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ent # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-PRES2-PASS

%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:eor # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eris # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:etur # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:emur # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:emini # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:entur # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-IMPF2

%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ebam # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ebas # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:ebat # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:ebamus # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:ebatis # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ebant # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-IMPF2-PASS

%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ebar # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ebaris # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:ebatur # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:ebamur # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:ebamini # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ebantur # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-FUTR2

%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ebo # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ebis # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:ebit # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:ebimus # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:ebitis # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ebunt # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-FUTR2-PASS

%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ebor # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eberis # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:ebitur # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:ebimur # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:ebimini # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ebuntur # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PRES2 

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:eam # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eas # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:eat # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:eamus # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:eatis # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:eant # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PRES2-PASS

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ear # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:earis # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:eatur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:eamur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:eamini # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:eantur # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF2 

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:erem # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eres # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:eret # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:eremus # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:eretis # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:erent # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF2-PASS

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:erer # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ereris # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:eretur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:eremur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:eremini # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:erentur # ;

LEXICON IMPERATIVE-PRESENT2

%<imp%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>: e # ;
%<imp%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>: ete # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! THIRD CONJUGATION i.e. lego/is/lexi/itum/ere !!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON CONJ3

%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PRES3 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PRES3-PASS ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-IMPF3 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-IMPF3-PASS ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-FUTR3 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-FUTR3-PASS ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PRES3 ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PRES3-PASS ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF3 ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF3-PASS ;
%<v%>: IMPERATIVE-PRESENT3 ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-PRES3

%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:o # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:is # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:it # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:imus # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:itis # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:unt # ;
